Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.05.030

Resignation of registered agent.

A registered agent may resign as agent by delivering to the secretary of state for filing a statement of resignation in accordance with RCW 23.95.445.

[ 2015 c 176 s 2119; 1989 c 165 s 42.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.